Hawaii, session 2026, HB663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§249-     Special number plates for the office of Hawaiian affairs.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of finance shall issue to any registered owner of a motor vehicle, who is a resident of the State and has completed the application and paid the required fees, a special number plate for the registered owner's motor vehicle that commemorates the office of Hawaiian affairs and its work to improve the well-being of Native Hawaiians through advocacy, research, community engagement, and land management. (b)  The director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu, in consultation with the directors of finance of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii, the chief of police of the city and county of Honolulu, and the chiefs of police of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii, and representatives from the office of Hawaiian affairs shall establish a special number plate design that: (1)  Contains words, images, or both, that indicate the special number plate is issued to recognize the office of Hawaiian affairs; (2)  Is similar in shape and size to the uniform state number plate prescribed by law; and (3)  Does not obstruct the visibility of the number or letters or any other information that is required by law to be on a number plate and is readily identifiable and distinguishable under actual traffic conditions. (c)  The special number plate design shall not: (1)  Infringe or otherwise violate any trademark, trade name, service mark, copyright, or other proprietary or property right; (2)  Represent any obscene or degrading image, idea, word, or phrase; (3)  Advertise or endorse a product, brand, or service that is provided for sale; (4)  Promote any religious belief; or (5)  Promote any philosophy based on prejudice or that is contrary to state civil rights laws. (d)  Each special number plate shall be securely fastened to the motor vehicle in lieu of the uniform state number plate. (e)  The director of finance shall charge a special number plate fee at least equal to the county's cost of providing the special number plate and administrative costs, if any, plus a fundraising fee to be determined by the director of finance in consultation with the office of Hawaiian affairs.  The fundraising fee shall be in addition to any other state or county fees collected for a motor vehicle registration or license plate. (f)  The director of finance may charge an additional fundraising fee, of the same or a different amount as the fundraising fee established pursuant to subsection (e), for the renewal of a special number plate.  If an additional fundraising fee is implemented pursuant to this subsection, the director of finance shall revoke the special number plate of the registered owner of a motor vehicle who fails to pay the additional fundraising fee imposed by this subsection. (g)  The revenue generated by the fundraising fees, or a portion of the revenue generated by the fundraising fees as determined by the director of finance, shall be deposited in the name of the office of Hawaiian affairs in a separate county budget account.  The director of finance shall determine the most efficient means of directing the revenue generated by the fundraising fees to the office of Hawaiian affairs. (h)  The director of finance may revoke all special number plates issued pursuant to this section if the total number of registered owners of motor vehicles that obtain the special number plates is less than one hundred fifty within three years of issuance of the first special number plate. (i)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any plates issued pursuant to sections 249-9.2 and 249-9.6. (j)  For the purposes of this section, unless a different meaning appears from the context, "special number plate" means a license plate that represents the office of Hawaiian affairs." SECTION 2.  Section 10-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§10-13  Appropriations; accounts; reports.  Moneys appropriated by the legislature for the office shall be payable by the director of finance, upon vouchers approved by the board, or by any officer elected or appointed by the board and authorized by the board to approve such vouchers on behalf of the board.  All moneys received by or on behalf of the board shall be deposited with the director of finance and kept separate from moneys in the state treasury; except that any moneys received from the federal government or from private contributions shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with conditions established by the agencies or persons from whom the moneys are received; and except that with the concurrence of the director of finance, moneys received from the federal government for research, training, and other related purposes of a transitory nature, and moneys in trust or revolving funds administered by the office, shall be deposited in depositories other than the state treasury and shall be reported on to the state comptroller under section 40-81, and rules prescribed thereunder. Income derived from the sale of goods or services, revenue collected from fundraising fees pursuant to section 249-   , and income from lands and property as described in section 10-3, shall be credited to special or other funds; provided that upon the recommendation of the office, the comptroller shall establish such other separate accounts or special funds for other designated revenues as may be directed by the board or its authorized representative." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________